Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 37.1 Homeless Bill of Rights

34-37.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Homeless Bill of Rights.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 356, § 1.

34-37.1-2.
Legislative intent.

At the present time, many persons have been rendered homeless as a result of economic hardship, a severe shortage of safe, affordable housing, and a shrinking social safety net.

Article 1, Section 2 of the Rhode Island State Constitution states in part, that “All free governments are instituted for the protection, safety, and happiness of the people. All laws, therefore, should be made for the good of the whole; and the burdens of the state ought to be fairly distributed among its citizens. No person shall be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law, nor shall any person be denied equal protection of the laws.”

Concordant with this fundamental belief, no person should suffer unnecessarily or be subject to unfair discrimination based on his or her homeless status. It is the intent of this chapter to ameliorate the adverse effects visited upon individuals and our communities when the state’s residents lack a home.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 356, § 1.

34-37.1-3.
Bill of Rights.

No person’s rights, privileges, or access to public services may be denied or abridged solely because he or she is homeless. Such a person shall be granted the same rights and privileges as any other resident of this state. A person experiencing homelessness:

Has the right to use and move freely in public spaces, including, but not limited to, public sidewalks, public parks, public transportation and public buildings, in the same manner as any other person, and without discrimination on the basis of his or her housing status;

Has the right to equal treatment by all state and municipal agencies, without discrimination on the basis of housing status;

Has the right not to face discrimination while seeking or maintaining employment due to his or her lack of permanent mailing address, or his or her mailing address being that of a shelter or social service provider;

Has the right to emergency medical care free from discrimination based on his or her housing status;

Has the right to vote, register to vote, and receive documentation necessary to prove identity for voting without discrimination due to his or her housing status;

Has the right to protection from disclosure of his or her records and information provided to homeless shelters and service providers to state, municipal and private entities without appropriate legal authority; and the right to confidentiality of personal records and information in accordance with all limitations on disclosure established by the Federal Homeless Management Information Systems, the Federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, and the Federal Violence Against Women Act; and

Has the right to a reasonable expectation of privacy in his or her personal property to the same extent as personal property in a permanent residence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 356, § 1.

34-37.1-4.
Damages and attorney’s fees.

In any civil action alleging a violation of this chapter, the court may award appropriate injunctive and declaratory relief, actual damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 356, § 1.

34-37.1-5.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, “housing status” shall have the same meaning as that contained in §

34-37-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 356, § 1.

34-37.1-6.
Homeless persons with service animals — Homeless shelters.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit persons from entering a homeless shelter while in possession of a service animal as defined in the “Americans with Disabilities Act” (28 C.F.R. § 35.136) and the state and federal “fair housing acts.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 297, § 1.